Hawaii statutes.
§604-2.5 Salary of district judges. Effective
July 1, 2004, the salary of a district court judge shall be as last recommended
by the judicial salary commission. Effective July 1, 2007, and every six years
thereafter, the salary of each district court judge of the various district
courts of the State shall be as last recommended by the commission on salaries
pursuant to section 26‑56, unless disapproved by the legislature.

Whenever the chief justice appoints a district
court judge of any of the various district courts of the State to serve
temporarily as a circuit court judge of any of the various circuit courts of
the State, the judge shall receive per diem compensation for the days on which
actual service is rendered based on the monthly rate of compensation paid to a
circuit court judge. For the purpose of determining per diem compensation in
this section, a month shall be deemed to consist of twenty-one days. [L 1970, c
188, §12; am L 1975, c 58, §28; am L 1982, c 129, §27; am L 1986, c 128, §25;
am L 1988, c 396, §2; am L 1990, c 72, §6; am L 1999, c 65, §7; am L 2000, c 2,
§5; am L 2003, c 123, §5; am L 2006, c 299, §10]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next